Washington statutes.
RCW 36.100.240

Eminent domain authorized.

(1) Any county with a population of one million five hundred thousand or more that creates a public facilities district pursuant to this chapter to acquire, own, and operate a convention and trade center transferred from a public nonprofit corporation is authorized to acquire by condemnation property or property rights as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of such district. If the legislative body of such county chooses to exercise its authority to acquire property by eminent domain on behalf of such public facilities district, it must do so pursuant to the procedures set forth in chapter 8.08 RCW.

(2) The accomplishment of the activities authorized by this chapter is declared to be a strictly public purpose of the municipality or municipal entities authorized to perform the same.

(3) The powers and authority conferred by this section are in addition and supplemental to existing powers or authority. Nothing contained in this section limits any other powers or authority of any agency, political subdivision, or unit of local government of this state.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 15 s 12.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Construction—2010 1st sp.s. c 15: See notes following RCW 36.100.010.